test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-IN-mikisasakay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mîkisasâkay - ok : # -m inanimate noun, beaded coat, Wolvengrey


     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg: mîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimîkisasâkânân
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimîkisasâkânaw
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimîkisasâkâwâw
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omîkisasâkâwâw
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: omîkisasâkâyiw

     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl: mîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimîkisasâkânâna
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimîkisasâkânawa
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimîkisasâkâwâwa
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omîkisasâkâwâwa
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: omîkisasâkâyiwa

     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Loc: mîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimîkisasâkânâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimîkisasâkânâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimîkisasâkâwâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omîkisasâkâwâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: omîkisasâkâyihk

     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [mîkisasâkâs, mîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [mîkisasâkâsa, mîkisasâkâsisa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [mîkisasâkâsihk, mîkisasâkâsisihk]
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nimîkisasâkâs, nimîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kimîkisasâkâs, kimîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [omîkisasâkâs, omîkisasâkâsis]
